Louisiana, session 2026, HB782.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 26:901(introductory paragraph), (1)(introductory paragraph), and
(32)(introductory paragraph), 903(1) through (4), 911(B)(2), 916(B), 918(A)(introductory
paragraph) and (1) and (3) and 926.1(J) and (K) are hereby amended and reenacted and R.S.
26:901(36), 901.1(D), 911(F), 914.1, 918(E), and 926 are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§901. Definitions
As used in this Chapter, the following terms have the meaning meanings
ascribed to them in this Section, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:
(1) "Alternative nicotine product" means any noncombustible product
containing nicotine or a nicotine analogue that is intended for human consumption,
whether chewed, absorbed, dissolved, or ingested by any other means. "Alternative
nicotine product" does not include any of the following:
* * *
(32) "Vapor product" means any noncombustible product containing
nicotine, a nicotine analogue, or other substances that employs employ a heating
element, power source, electronic circuit, or other electronic, chemical, or
mechanical means, regardless of shape or size, that can be used to produce vapor
from nicotine or other substances. "Vapor product" includes any electronic cigarette,
electronic cigar, electronic cigarillo, electronic pipe, or similar product or device, and
any vapor cartridge or other container of nicotine or nicotine analogue in a solution
or other form that is intended to be used with or in an electronic cigarette, electronic
cigar, electronic cigarillo, electronic pipe, or similar product or device. "Vapor
product" does not include any of the following:
* * *
(36)(a) "Nicotine analogue" means a substance with either of the following
characteristics:
(i) The chemical structure is substantially similar to the chemical structure
of nicotine.
Page 2 of 9
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 782 ENROLLED
(ii) Has, purports to have, or is represented to have, an effect on the central
nervous system that is similar to or greater than the effect of nicotine on the central
nervous system.
(b) Factors relevant to determining whether a substance is a nicotine
analogue include but are not limited to the marketing, advertising, and labeling of the
substance, and whether the substance has been manufactured, formulated, sold,
distributed, or marketed with the intent to avoid the provisions of this Chapter and
other applicable provisions of law.
* * *
§901.1. Facts and findings
* * *
D. The provisions of this Chapter shall not apply to lawful activities
authorized pursuant to R.S. 40:1046 et seq. or R.S. 40:966(F), and regulated by the
Louisiana Department of Health.
* * *
§903. Permit fees
The fees for each permit shall not exceed amounts provided for in the
following schedule and in accordance with regulations promulgated pursuant to the
provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act:
(1) Retail dealer permit – $ 25.00 $100.00 per year or any portion thereof.
(2) Vending machine operator – $75.00 $300.00 per year or any portion
thereof.
(3) Vending machine – $5.00 $20.00 per machine per year or any portion
thereof.
(4) Wholesale dealer – $75.00 $300.00 per year or any portion thereof.
* * *
§911. Acts prohibited
* * *
B.
* * *
Page 3 of 9
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 782 ENROLLED
(2) No wholesale dealer shall sell tobacco products, alternative nicotine
products, or vapor products for resale except to a retail dealer operating with either
a valid registration certificate or a valid unsuspended permit. A wholesale dealer
shall verify that a retail dealer is operating with either a valid registration certificate
or a valid unsuspended permit prior to any sale of tobacco products, alternative
nicotine products, or vapor products to a retail dealer.
* * *
F. No person shall sell, give, serve, deliver, or furnish to a person in this state
a product that contains a nicotine analogue.
* * *
§914.1. Three-tier system for vapor products
A.(1) A manufacturer of vapor products with a Louisiana permit shall not do
any of the following:
(a) Hold a retail dealer permit issued pursuant to this Chapter for the purpose
of selling vapor products to Louisiana consumers.
(b) Hold a wholesale dealer permit issued pursuant to this Chapter for the
purpose of selling vapor products to Louisiana consumers.
(c) Possess any direct or indirect financial interest in a wholesale or retail
dealer of vapor products with a Louisiana permit.
(d) Ship vapor products directly to a retail dealer with a Louisiana permit.
(e) Sell vapor products directly to a retail dealer with a Louisiana permit for
resale to Louisiana consumers.
(f) Ship vapor products directly to a Louisiana consumer from an out-of-state
or in-state seller.
(2)(a) A wholesale dealer of vapor products with a Louisiana permit shall not
hold a retail dealer permit issued pursuant to this Chapter for the purpose of selling
vapor products to Louisiana consumers.
(b)(i) A wholesale dealer with a Louisiana permit may sell or distribute
vapor products or any other product covered by this Chapter to a retail dealer with
a Louisiana permit that is an affiliated entity of the wholesale dealer.
Page 4 of 9
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 782 ENROLLED
(ii) The term "affiliated entity" as used in this Subparagraph means any
person or entity that directly or indirectly controls, is controlled by, or is under
common control with another person or entity.
(3) A retail dealer of vapor products with a Louisiana permit shall not do
either of the following:
(a) Hold a wholesale dealer permit issued pursuant to this Chapter for the
purpose of selling vapor products to another retail dealer with a Louisiana permit.
(b) Purchase vapor products from any person other than a wholesaler dealer
with a Louisiana permit.
B. The provisions of this Section do not apply to lawful marijuana or
marijuana products authorized pursuant to R.S. 40:1046 et seq. and regulated by the
Louisiana Department of Health.
* * *
§916. Suspensions or revocations
* * *
B. The commissioner shall have shall conduct periodic examinations made
of the businesses of all persons holding permits under in accordance with this
Chapter or of locations where tobacco products, vapor products, or alternative
nicotine products are reasonably believed to be sold without permits. If a violation
of the this Chapter or of any rule or regulation of the commissioner or the secretary
is observed, the commissioner may give the permittee person a written warning. If
the permittee person has been previously warned or if the violation is of a
sufficiently serious nature, the commissioner may instruct any agent or employee of
the commissioner to prepare and file, upon information and belief based upon the
facts in hand available, a petition for assessing a fine, or suspension or revocation of
the permit, setting forth the facts and circumstances of the violation, and shall
thereupon summon the permittee person to appear and show cause why the permit
should not be suspended or revoked or the fine not assessed.
* * *
Page 5 of 9
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 782 ENROLLED
§918. Civil penalties
A. Notwithstanding any other provision of this Chapter to the contrary, the
commissioner may, in lieu of or in addition to revocation or suspension of a permit
issued under pursuant to the authority of this Chapter, impose the following schedule
of fines to be paid into the state treasury:
(1) For a first offense, not less than fifty dollars but not more than five
hundred one thousand dollars.
* * *
(3) For a third offense, which occurs within two years of the first offense, not
less than five hundred dollars but not more than two thousand five hundred four
thousand dollars.
* * *
E. Notwithstanding any other provision of this Chapter to the contrary, for
a violation of R.S. 26:913, the commissioner may impose the following schedule of
fines to be paid into the state treasury:
(1) For a first offense, not less than five hundred dollars but not more than
one thousand dollars.
(2) For a second offense, which occurs within two years of the first offense,
not less than one thousand dollars but not more than two thousand dollars.
(3) For a third offense, which occurs within two years of the first offense, not
less than two thousand dollars but not more than four thousand dollars.
* * *
§926. Seizure and forfeiture of alternative nicotine products and vapor products in
the possession of unpermitted retail dealers
All alternative nicotine products and vapor products purchased, offered for
sale, or sold for retail sale or to a consumer in this state in violation of this Chapter,
including such products found on the premises of a business or any location
operating without a permit in violation of this Chapter, are contraband and subject
to forfeiture and shall not be purchased or sold for retail sale or to a consumer in this
state. The commissioner may seize and destroy or dispose of such products. The cost
Page 6 of 9
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 782 ENROLLED
of such seizure and destruction or disposal shall be borne by the person from whom
the products are confiscated. Within twenty-one days of destroying or otherwise
disposing of any such seized products, the commissioner shall provide an invoice to
the person from whom the products are confiscated, and payment shall be due to the
commissioner within twenty-one days of the person receiving the invoice.
§926.1. Vapor product and alternative nicotine product directory
* * *
J.(1) The sale, offer for sale, possession, or transportation of vapor products
or alternative nicotine products not listed on the directory for sale in this state or to
a person in this state by any person, including a permitted wholesale dealer, or retail
dealer, or a person without a permit, shall be subject to provisions of R.S. 47:858,
859, and 860 as if such wholesale dealer or retail dealer did not possess a valid
permit. the following penalties:
(a) For a first offense, one thousand dollars.
(b) For a second offense, which occurs within two years of the first offense,
two thousand dollars, and the permit of the person shall be suspended for six months.
(c) For a third offense, which occurs within two years of the first offense,
four thousand five hundred dollars, and the permit of the person shall be revoked.
(2) Each unit of vapor product or alternative nicotine product sold or offered
for sale, possessed, or transported shall constitute a separate violation for purposes
of Paragraph (1) of this Subsection.
(3) The commissioner or the attorney general may bring an action in the
courts of this state to enforce this Chapter and shall be entitled to recover the costs
of the investigation, expert witness fees, the action, and reasonable attorney fees.
(4) If a court determines that a person has violated this Section by having
sold or distributed vapor products or alternative nicotine products not listed on the
directory within the state or to a person in this state, the court shall order any profits,
gains, gross receipts, or other benefits from the violation to be disgorged. Revenue
received pursuant to this Paragraph shall be used to recover the costs of the
investigation, expert witness fees, the action, and reasonable attorney fees, with any
Page 7 of 9
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 782 ENROLLED
remaining funds to be used by the office of alcohol and tobacco control exclusively
for compensating such agency for its costs expended in enforcing this Chapter,
conducting the periodic examinations authorized by R.S. 26:916, and taking any
resulting enforcement actions.
(5) A second or subsequent violation of R.S. 26:926.1 is an unfair and
deceptive trade practice within the meaning of R.S. 51:1405(A).
(6) Revenue received through fines imposed by this Section shall be used by
the office of alcohol and tobacco control exclusively for conducting the periodic
examinations authorized by R.S. 26:926 and taking any resulting enforcement
actions.
K. Any other violation of this Section shall result in a fine of five hundred
dollars per offense be subject to the provisions of R.S. 26:918.
* * *
Section 2. R.S. 47:843(C)(3) is hereby amended and reenacted and R.S.
47:841(B)(8) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§841. Imposition of tax
There is hereby levied a tax upon the sale, use, consumption, handling, or
distribution of all cigars, cigarettes, smoking and smokeless tobacco, and vapor
products and electronic cigarettes as defined herein, within the state of Louisiana,
according to the classification and rates hereinafter set forth:
* * *
B. Cigarettes.
* * *
(8) Any tax imposed pursuant to this Subsection shall be reduced by sixty
five percent for any product the secretary of the United States Department of Health
and Human Services determines to be a modified risk tobacco product pursuant to
21 U.S.C. 387k, as amended from time to time.
* * *
§843. Use of stamps or meter impression required; limitations
* * *
Page 8 of 9
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 782 ENROLLED
C. Purchase of stamps
* * *
(3) Cigarette tax stamps shall be sold by the secretary of the Department of
Revenue to bonded, registered Louisiana tobacco dealers in the state of Louisiana
who hold a valid stamping agent designation in accordance with R.S. 26:902(2)(a)
and who have a direct purchasing contract with a manufacturer at a discount of five
six and one-half percent from the face value, when purchased in quantities of not less
than one hundred dollars face value, and the same provisions and discount shall
apply where when the metered stamping machine or device is used. Wholesale
tobacco dealers qualified to purchase Louisiana stamps with benefit of the discount
described in this Paragraph shall receive the additional benefit of a ten percent
discount on the purchase of Louisiana stamps to be applied to those products the
United States Food and Drug Administration has determined to be a modified risk
tobacco product.
* * *
Section 3. If any provision or item of this Act, or the application thereof, is held
invalid, including, but not limited to, any provision in violation of the single object rule set
forth in the Louisiana Constitution, Article 3, Section 15(A), such invalidity shall not affect
other provisions, items, or applications of this Act which can be given effect without the
invalid provision, item, or application, and to this end the provisions of this Act are hereby
declared severable.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 9 of 9
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.